src-fst-morphology-affixes-possessive-suffixes.lexc.md
Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages

# North Saami Possessive suffixes

* **LEXICON PxVvowch** for vowel stems, with X2, X1 with stem vowel change

* **LEXICON Px12VvowchDIPH** for vowel stems with stem vowel change and diph, 1. p

* **LEXICON Px1Vvowch** for vowel stems with stem vowel change, 1. p

* **LEXICON Px2Vvowch** for vowel stems with stem vowel change, 1. and 2. p

* **LEXICON Px3Vvowch** for vowel stems with stem vowel change, 3. p

* **LEXICON PxV** for vowel stems, without stem vowel change

* **LEXICON Px1V** for first person vowel stems

* **LEXICON Px2V** for second person vowel stems

* **LEXICON Px3V** for third person vowel stems

* **LEXICON PxA** for a-stems

* **LEXICON Px1A** for a-stems

* **LEXICON Px2A** for a-stems

* **LEXICON Px3A** for a-stems

* **LEXICON PxC** for consonant stems

* **LEXICON Px1C** for consonant stems

* **LEXICON Px2C** for consonant stems

* **LEXICON Px3C** for consonant stems

* **LEXICON PxPlComC** for plural comitative forms of consonant stems

* **LEXICON PxPlComV1** for first person vowel stems with vow change, directing onw

* **LEXICON PxPlCom12V** for first, second person comitative Px

* **LEXICON PxPlCom3V** for third person comitative Px

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessive-suffixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessive-suffixes.lexc)</small>

---
